Missouri, session 2026, HB1647.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 379, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 379.199, to read as follows:
379.199. 1. Whether or not a claim has been assigned or subrogated to an
insurer, if, prior to the filing of a civil action for recovery of property damage arising
from an alleged tort, a defendant or his or her insurer or authorized representative, or
any combination thereof, reimburses a claimant's insurer all or any part of the
claimant's deductible or property damage amounts paid by the claimant's insurer, then
any portion of the claimant's claim for damages that are satisfied by the reimbursement
shall not be recoverable from the defendant or defendant's insurer to the extent such
recovery would result in a duplicative recovery by the claimant.
2. Nothing in this section shall impair any lawful subrogation rights of an
insurer.
3. Notwithstanding section 490.715, any party may present evidence of payments
made under this section to the claimant or on behalf of the claimant to the claimant's
insurer. Such payments shall be credited as an offset against any compensable
judgment in a civil action for recovery of property damage.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.